apertium_magahi_in_canonical_form.dix
<pardef n="rah/a__v">
    <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_hi</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_he</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_he</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_ha</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_ha</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_haWina</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_haWina</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_hai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_hai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_haWina</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a_h2"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_haWina</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a_h2"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>iwa_hl</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>iwa_he</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>iwa_he</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>iwa_ha</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>iwa_ha</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>iwa_haWina</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>iwa_haWina</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>iwa_hai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>iwa_hai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>iwa_haWina</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a_h2"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>iwa_haWina</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a_h2"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>a_lelI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_lele</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_lele</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_lela</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_lela</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_lelaWina</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_lelaWina</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_lelai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_lelai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_lelaWina</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a_h2"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_lelaWina</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a_h2"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>abai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ama</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>abe</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>abe</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>aba</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>aba</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    
    <e><p><l>a_waWina</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_waWina</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>awai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>awai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_waWina</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a_h2"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a_waWina</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a_h2"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    

</pardef>

</pardefs>

<e lm="rah"><i>rah</i><par n="rah/a__v"/></e>
